Indiana, session 2026, HB1297.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 5-1.2-2-85 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 85. "Water intensive facility" means a facility that
consumes an average of at least five hundred thousand (500,000)
gallons of water per day in ordinary operation.
SECTION 2. IC 5-1.2-2-86 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 86. "Water utility" has the meaning set forth in
IC 8-1-30.8-4.
SECTION 3. IC 5-1.2-9-6.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.4. A bid submitted in response to a notice published
under section 5 of this chapter must include a description of the
size and character of each improvement proposed by the bidder to
be constructed or established on the offered property. The
description must include:
(1) the proposed location of the improvement;
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


(2) the expected water consumption of the improvement,
including:
(A) an estimate of the amount, in gallons, of water the
improvement will annually consume in ordinary operation;
(B) an estimate of the rate, in gallons per day, of the
improvement's peak water demand;
(C) any expected seasonal variation in the improvement's
water consumption; and
(D) any special service requirements with regard to the
improvement's water utility service;
(3) the expected operating hours of the improvement; and
(4) the date on which the improvement is expected to
commence operation.
SECTION 4. IC 5-1.2-9-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) If a bid submitted in response to a notice
published under section 5 of this chapter includes proposed
construction or establishment of an improvement that the
authority determines, based on the information provided by the
bidder under section 6.4 of this chapter, will be a water intensive
facility, the authority shall provide notice of the proposed water
intensive facility to the water utility that provides water utility
service to the proposed location of the water intensive facility. The
notice must include the information submitted by the bidder with
regard to the water intensive facility under section 6.4 of this
chapter.
(b) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving notice of a
proposed water intensive facility under subsection (a), a water
utility shall submit to the authority a plan for the water utility's
provision of water utility service to the water intensive facility. The
plan must include provisions specifically addressing how the water
utility will:
(1) reliably meet both the ordinary and peak water demand of
the water intensive facility; and
(2) ensure that incremental costs of supplying water utility
service to the water intensive facility are allocated to and paid
by the water intensive facility.
SECTION 5. IC 5-1.2-9-7, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2018,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The authority may reject any or all bids or may
make awards to the highest and best bidder or bidders. In determining
the highest and best bids, the authority may take into consideration the
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


following:
(1) The size and character of the improvements for the economic
development project as proposed by the bidder to be made on the
property and the terms and conditions of the consideration offered
by the bidder.
(2) The bidder's plans and ability to carry out the economic
development project with reasonable promptness.
(3) Whether the property and interests to be acquired by the
bidder will be leased or released for the economic development
project.
(4) The nature and extent of any obligations to be undertaken by
the authority in conjunction with the improvement of the property
or interests to be acquired for the economic development project
as proposed by the bidder.
(5) The potential impact of the bidder's proposal on the creation
of new employment or the retention of existing employment
resulting from the economic development project.
(6) The potential impact of the bidder's proposal to attract or
establish a major new business enterprise or to retain or expand
a significant existing business enterprise that will provide or
preserve gainful employment for the citizens of the state.
(7) The economic benefits to the state and its citizens that will
result from the economic development project, as proposed by the
bidder, including the dollar volume of new or preserved wages
and salaries, increases in or preservation of state and local
government tax revenues, the incremental economic benefits to
the citizens of the state, the state, and local governmental units
potentially resulting from the economic development project as
proposed by the bidder, and any other direct or indirect economic
benefit to the state and its citizens resulting from the economic
development project as proposed by the bidder.
(8) The potential impact and benefit to the state and its citizens of
the economic development project as proposed by the bidder from
the standpoint of both human and economic welfare.
(9) The plan submitted under section 6.5 of this chapter for
provision of water utility service to any water intensive
facility proposed in the bid.
SECTION 6. IC 5-1.2-9-8, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2018,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) In making an award to the highest and best
bidder as provided in section 7 of this chapter, the authority shall
determine whether in its judgment the potential benefits to the state and
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


its citizens of the economic development project as proposed by the
bidder exceed the direct costs to the authority of acquiring the property
and interests being offered for sale or lease for the economic
development project less any sums to be paid by the successful bidder
pursuant to its bid.
(b) If a bid includes proposed construction or establishment of
a water intensive facility, the authority may make an award to the
bidder only if the authority determines that the plan for provision
of water utility service to the water intensive facility submitted by
a water utility under section 6.5 of this chapter adequately ensures
that:
(1) the water utility can reliably meet both the ordinary and
peak water demand of the water intensive facility; and
(2) incremental costs of supplying water to the water intensive
facility will be allocated to and paid by the water intensive
facility.
(c) The authority's judgment concerning this determination the
determinations under this section shall be based on the economic
studies, analyses, and projections that the authority determines are
reasonably necessary.
(d) The authority's determination is determinations under this
section are final and conclusive.
SECTION 7. IC 5-1.2-9-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.189-2018,
SECTION 25, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. The authority shall prepare a report that
includes the following:
(1) briefly describes A brief description of the proposed
economic development project.
(2) Estimates of the number and expense of public works or
services that would be made necessary or desirable by the
proposed economic development project, including public ways,
schools, water, sewers, street lights, and fire protection.
(3) The plan submitted under section 6.5 of this chapter for
provision of water utility service to any water intensive
facility that is proposed to be constructed or established as
part of the proposed economic development project.
(3) (4) Estimates of the total costs of the proposed economic
development project.
(4) (5) For an economic development project that is not
exclusively either a pollution control facility or an educational
facility project, estimates of the number of jobs and the payroll to
be created or saved by the project.
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


(5) (6) For educational facility projects, describes a description
of how the project promotes the educational enrichment
(including cultural, intellectual, scientific, or artistic
opportunities) of the people of the state. and
(6) (7) For pollution control facilities, describes a description of
the facilities and how they will abate, reduce, or prevent pollution.
The report shall be submitted to the executive director or chair of the
plan commission, if any, having jurisdiction over the economic
development project and, if the number of new jobs estimated exceeds
one hundred (100), to the superintendent of the school corporation
where the economic development project will be located. The
executive director or chair of the plan commission and the school
superintendent may formulate their written comments concerning the
report and transmit their comments, if any, to the authority within five
(5) days after the receipt of the report.
SECTION 8. IC 5-28-2-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. "Water intensive facility" means a facility that
consumes an average of at least five hundred thousand (500,000)
gallons of water per day in ordinary operation.
SECTION 9. IC 5-28-2-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9. "Water utility" has the meaning set forth in
IC 8-1-30.8-4.
SECTION 10. IC 5-28-6-5.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.4. The corporation shall require that an application
for a job creation incentive from the corporation must include a
description of the size and character of each improvement that the
applicant proposes to construct or establish with the benefit of the
job creation incentive. The description must include:
(1) the proposed location of the improvement;
(2) the expected water consumption of the improvement,
including:
(A) an estimate of the amount, in gallons, of water the
improvement will annually consume in ordinary operation;
(B) an estimate of the rate, in gallons per day, of the
improvement's peak water demand;
(C) any expected seasonal variation in the improvement's
water consumption; and
(D) any special service requirements with regard to the
improvement's water utility service;
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


(3) the expected operating hours of the improvement; and
(4) the date on which the improvement is expected to
commence operation.
SECTION 11. IC 5-28-6-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) If the corporation determines, based on
information included in an application for a job creation incentive
under section 5.4 of this chapter, that a proposed improvement
described in the application will be a water intensive facility, the
corporation shall provide notice of the proposed water intensive
facility to the water utility that provides water utility service to the
proposed location of the water intensive facility. The notice must
include the information included in the application with regard to
the water intensive facility under section 5.4 of this chapter.
(b) Not later than thirty (30) days after receiving notice of a
proposed water intensive facility under subsection (a), a water
utility shall submit to the corporation a plan for the water utility's
provision of water utility service to the water intensive facility. The
plan must include provisions specifically addressing how the water
utility will:
(1) reliably meet both the ordinary and peak water demand of
the water intensive facility; and
(2) ensure that incremental costs of supplying water utility
service to the water intensive facility are allocated to and paid
by the water intensive facility.
(c) Upon receipt of a water utility's plan for provision of water
utility service to a water intensive facility under subsection (b), the
corporation shall provide the plan to the plan commission, if any,
having jurisdiction over the proposed location of the water
intensive facility.
(d) If an application for a job creation incentive includes
proposed construction or establishment of a water intensive
facility, the corporation may grant the job creation incentive to the
applicant only if the corporation determines that the plan for
provision of water utility service to the water intensive facility
submitted by a water utility under subsection (b) adequately
ensures that:
(1) the water utility can reliably meet both the ordinary and
peak water demand of the proposed water intensive facility;
and
(2) incremental costs of supplying water to the proposed
water intensive facility will be allocated to and paid by the
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


water intensive facility.
SECTION 12. IC 36-7-1-21.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21.5. "Water intensive facility"
means a facility that consumes an average of at least five hundred
thousand (500,000) gallons of water per day in ordinary operation.
SECTION 13. IC 36-7-1-21.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 21.6. "Water utility" has the
meaning set forth in IC 8-1-30.8-4.
SECTION 14. IC 36-7-2-15.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15.1. A unit may provide
financing (as defined in IC 36-7-11.9-5) under this article for
construction or establishment of a proposed water intensive facility
only if the unit:
(1) provides to the water utility that provides water utility
service to the proposed location of the water intensive facility
notice that:
(A) includes:
(i) the proposed location of the water intensive facility;
(ii) an estimate of the amount, in gallons, of water the
water intensive facility will annually consume in
ordinary operation;
(iii) an estimate of the rate, in gallons per day, of the
water intensive facility's peak water demand;
(iv) a description of any expected seasonal variation in
the water intensive facility's water consumption;
(v) a description of any special service requirements with
regard to the water intensive facility's water utility
service;
(vi) the expected operating hours of the water intensive
facility; and
(vii) the date on which the water intensive facility is
expected to commence operation; and
(B) requests that the water utility submit to the unit, not
later than thirty (30) days after receiving the notice, a plan
for provision of water utility service to the proposed water
intensive facility that includes provisions specifically
addressing how the water utility will:
(i) reliably meet both the ordinary and peak water
demand of the water intensive facility; and
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119


(ii) ensure that incremental costs of supplying water
utility service to the water intensive facility are allocated
to and paid by the water intensive facility;
(2) determines that the plan submitted by the water utility in
response to the notice under subdivision (1) adequately
ensures that:
(A) the water utility can reliably meet both the ordinary
and peak water demand of the proposed water intensive
facility; and
(B) incremental costs of supplying water to the proposed
water intensive facility will be allocated to and paid by the
water intensive facility; and
(3) provides the water utility's plan to the plan commission, if
any, having jurisdiction over the proposed location of the
water intensive facility.
2026 IN 1297—LS 6724/DI 119